Utah statutes.
58-31b-802.   Consumer access to provider charges.

Beginning January 1, 2011, a nurse whose license under this chapter authorizes independent practice shall, when requested by a consumer:

(1)  make a list of prices charged by the nurse available for the consumer which includes the nurse's 25 most frequently performed:

(a)  clinic procedures or clinic services;

(b)  out-patient procedures; and

(c)  in-patient procedures; and

(2)  provide the consumer with information regarding any discount available for:

(a)  services not covered by insurance; or

(b)  prompt payment of billed charges.

